Maryland, session 2026, SB0793.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–758.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH.
(3) “ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(I) IS EMPLOYED BY A QUALIFIED EMPLOYER; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0793*

SENATE BILL 793
(II) PROVIDES WRITTEN VERIFICATION FROM A LICENSED
PHYSICIAN THAT THE INDIVIDUAL DONATED ONE OR MORE OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S
ORGANS TO ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL FOR ORGAN TRANSPLANTATION.
(4) “ORGAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 10–208(W) OF THIS
TITLE.
(5) “ORGAN DONATION LEAVE” MEANS A PERIOD THAT:
(I) AN ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEE IS ABSENT FROM EMPLOYMENT
FOR THE PURPOSE OF DONATING AN ORGAN; AND
(II) IS IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PAID LEAVE BENEFITS
OFFERED BY THE EMPLOYER, INCLUDING ANY BENEFITS OFFERED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH TITLE 8.3 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE.
(6) “QUALIFIED EMPLOYER” MEANS AN EMPLOYER THAT:
(I) MAINTAINS A WRITTEN POLICY PROVIDING PAID ORGAN
DONATION LEAVE; AND
(II) PAYS AN ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEE AT LEAST 100% OF THE
EMPLOYEE’S REGULAR WAGES DURING ANY ORGAN DONATION LEAVE TAKEN BY THE
ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEE.
(B) A QUALIFIED EMPLOYER THAT EMPLOYS AN ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEE MAY
CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE INCOME TAX IN THE AMOUNT STATED ON THE
TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH AN ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEE
TAKES PAID ORGAN DONATION LEAVE, THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION
EQUALS 100% OF THE WAGES PAID TO THE ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEE DURING THE FIRST
12 WEEKS OF THE ORGAN DONATION LEAVE.
(2) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION EXCEEDS THE
STATE INCOME TAX FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR, ANY UNUSED CREDIT MAY BE
CARRIED FORWARD AND APPLIED FOR SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEARS UNTIL THE
EARLIER OF:
(I) THE DATE ON WHICH THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT IS
USED; OR

SENATE BILL 793 3
(II) THE DATE OF THE EXPIRATION OF THE 3RD TAXABLE YEAR
AFTER THE TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH THE CREDIT WAS ALLOWED.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON
APPLICATION BY A QUALIFIED EMPLOYER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE A TAX
CREDIT CERTIFICATE IN THE AMOUNT ALLOWABLE UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION.
(2) THE APPLICATION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE NAME OF THE QUALIFIED EMPLOYER;
(II) EVIDENCE THAT THE QUALIFIED EMPLOYER IS:
1. DULY ORGANIZED AND IN GOOD STANDING IN THE
JURISDICTION UNDER THE LAWS UNDER WHICH IT IS ORGANIZED;
2. CURRENT IN THE PAYMENT OF ALL OBLIGATIONS TO
THE STATE OR ANY UNIT OR SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE; AND
3. NOT IN DEFAULT UNDER THE TERMS OF ANY
CONTRACT WITH, INDEBTEDNESS TO, OR GRANT FROM THE STATE OR ANY UNIT OR
SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE;
(III) PROOF OF THE WAGES PAID TO EACH ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEE;
(IV) PROOF OF THE PAID ORGAN DONATION LEAVE BENEFITS
ACCRUED TO EACH ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEE; AND
(V) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE DEPARTMENT
REQUIRES.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE QUALIFIED EMPLOYER
WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER THE RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION OF THE DEPARTMENT’S
APPROVAL OR DENIAL OF THE APPLICATION.
(E) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31 EACH TAXABLE YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL REPORT TO THE COMPTROLLER ON THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION DURING THE PRIOR TAXABLE YEAR.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE COMPTROLLER JOINTLY SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.

SENATE BILL 793
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.